Massachusetts, session 194th, S2710.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
(a) As used in this act, the following words shall have the following meanings unless the 
context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Access”, any proper means by which a person may read or use digital resources, print 
materials, records or other information held by a public library.  
“Digital resources”, any books, textbooks, workbooks, videos, databases, newspapers, 
magazines, periodicals, charts, graphs, movies, games, maps, interactive applications, software 
and other educational or entertainment materials in any electronic format, . 
“Print materials”, primarily paper-based materials found in physical or hard-copy format. 
“Public library”, (i) public library; (ii) public school library; or (iii) public research 
library. 
(b) There shall be a special legislative commission to assess and address challenges faced 
by public libraries and digital resource collections. 

of 3 13  (c) The commission shall: (i) study the cost trends and expenditures of public libraries 
within the commonwealth relative to digital resources and collections; (ii) study patron use of, 
and satisfaction with, digital resources; (iii) research the opinions of legal experts and scholars 
relative to the differences between existing licensing for digital resources and the use of print 
materials and how these differences may impact patron experience and access to diverse 
collections; (iv) research and describe how patron privacy records and metadata are kept, used, 
accessed and sold as it relates to patron use and access of digital resources through a public 
library; (v) make recommendations addressing the security and privacy of data related to digital 
resources; (vi) identify and describe concerns, if any, regarding patron protection and access 
issues relative to digital resources; (vii) investigate and summarize the actions of other states in 
addressing digital resource creation; (viii) examine the impact of digital resources on library 
users; and (ix) recommend legislative and executive action to: (A) support the sustainability of 
diverse digital resources in public libraries; (B) better support access to diverse digital resources; 
(C) enable the continuation of public lending to all residents; and (D) protect patron data in the 
course of digital resource use. 
(d) The commission shall consist of: 2 persons appointed by the speaker of the house of 
representatives, 1 of whom shall be designated as co-chair by the speaker of the house of 
representatives; 2 persons appointed by the president of the senate, 1 of whom shall be 
designated as co-chair  by the senate president; 1 person appointed by the minority leader of the 
senate; 1 person appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; the director of 
the board of library commissioners or a designee; the attorney general or a designee; the director 
of the Massachusetts office on disability or a designee; the president of the Massachusetts 
Library Association; the president of the Massachusetts School Library Association; the 

of 3 36 president of the Boston public library or a designee; the executive director of the Massachusetts 
Center for the Book, Inc.; and 5 members who shall be appointed by the governor,  1 of whom 
shall be a research librarian from a public  research institution of higher education, 1 of whom 
shall be a representative of the Association of American Publishers, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a 
representative of a digital distributor of electronic books, 1 of whom shall be an expert in the 
field of intellectual property or copyright law and 1 of whom shall be an expert in consumer 
protection laws. 
(e) The co-chairs shall direct the schedule and work of the commission. A simple 
majority vote of the commission members present may be requested for any actions of the 
commission and all members of the commission shall have a vote. The co-chairs may create 
subgroups to focus on specific responsibilities of the commission. The co-chairs may invite 
guests to participate in meetings as speakers.  
(f) The commission may seek assistance from outside experts at the discretion of the co-
chairs. The commission may use consulting and research firms in the course of its study, subject 
to appropriation. 
(g) Not later than October 15, 2026, the commission shall submit a report with its 
findings and any recommendations to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the 
governor and the attorney general.